Louisiana, session 2026, SB210.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:425(A)(1) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§425. Commissioners
A. Number. (1) In addition to the commissioner-in-charge, at the following
elections there shall be the following number of additional commissioners at each
precinct:
(a) For the gubernatorial primary and general elections, the congressional
primary and general elections, the presidential preference primary election, primary
and general elections for party primary offices, fall general elections held on the
sixth Saturday after the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November of a
congressional election year, and the primary and general elections for municipal
officers in a parish containing a municipality with a population of four hundred
seventy-five thousand or more held every four years beginning in 1994:
(i) Four commissioners for precincts with more than three hundred active
registered voters.
(ii) Three commissioners for precincts with three hundred active registered
voters or less.
(b) For all elections not specifically provided for in Subparagraph (a) of this
Paragraph or in Part III of Chapter 6 of this Code:
(i) Three commissioners for precincts with more than three hundred active
registered voters eligible to vote in the election.
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 210 ENROLLED
(ii) Two commissioners for precincts with three hundred or fewer active
registered voters eligible to vote in the election.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.